Montana, session 2025, HB144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 50-60-115, MCA, is amended to read:
"50-60-115. Building codes council -- purpose and structure. (1) There is a building codes council
for the purpose of assisting the department with the application, implementation, and interpretation of the state
building code and building codes adopted by counties, cities, or towns. The council shall work cooperatively
with the department and with representatives of the construction industry, as well as members of the interested
public, to harmonize building codes and related rules with both the needs of the construction industry and the
public interest in efficiency, cost-effectiveness, and safety.
(2) The council consists of 12 13 members appointed by the governor, unless otherwise specified,
as follows:
(a) a practicing architect licensed in Montana;
(b) a practicing professional engineer licensed in Montana;
(c) a representative from the building contractor industry;
(d) a county, city, or town building inspector;
(e) a representative of the manufactured housing industry;
(f) a member of the general public who does not hold public office and who does not represent the
same industry or agency as another council member;
(g) the director of the department of public health and human services or the director's designee;
(h) a licensed electrician selected by the state electrical board;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 144
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 144
(i) a licensed plumber selected by the board of plumbers;
(j) a licensed elevator mechanic selected by the department;
(k) the state fire marshal or the fire marshal's designee; and
(l) a representative of the home building industry; and
(m) a representative of the Montana state fire chiefs' association.
(3) The appointed council members serve at the pleasure of the governor for terms of 3 years.
(4) The council is allocated to the department for administrative purposes only as provided in 2-15-
121.
(5) The council and its members are entitled to compensation as provided in 2-15-122."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 144
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 144, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 144
INTRODUCED BY E. TILLEMAN, M. NIKOLAKAKOS, E. ALBUS, K. LOVE, L. BENNETT, J. WEBER, C.
SCHOMER, E. BUTTREY, R. MINER, L. DEMING, G. NIKOLAKAKOS, G. PARRY, S. MANESS
AN ACT REVISING MEMBERSHIP LAWS RELATED TO THE BUILDING CODES COUNCIL; INCREASING
THE NUMBER OF MEMBERS ON THE COUNCIL AND DESIGNATING QUALIFICATIONS FOR THE
ADDITIONAL MEMBER; AND AMENDING SECTION 50-60-115, MCA.”